Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority

154.20-010.
Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority — Members — Officers.

There is created and established within the cabinet, subject to the authority of the board, the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority as an agency, instrumentality, and political subdivision of the Commonwealth and a public body corporate and politic with all powers, duties, and responsibilities delegated to it by the board or as otherwise provided by law, including all programs, powers, duties, rights, and obligations of the Kentucky Development Finance Authority and the Kentucky Rural Economic Development Authority.

Any interest, right, or cause of action held in whole or in part by any person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, government agency, or other entity under any agreement, contract, lease, mortgage, guarantee, bond, note, refund bond, or other financial transaction or obligation, made, issued, or otherwise entered into by any of the authorities, programs, or funds specified in subsection (1) of this section or that may be delegated to the authority by the board, shall not be impaired or otherwise diminished.

Any interest, right, or cause of action held in whole or in part by any of the authorities, programs, or funds specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not be impaired or otherwise diminished, but shall be assumed by the authority, for and on behalf of the cabinet.

The authority shall consist of a committee of seven (7) persons, including six (6) persons appointed by the board who shall be private citizens of the Commonwealth, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet who shall serve ex officio. Any person appointed to the committee shall have experience and expertise in business or finance.

Two (2) members initially appointed to the committee shall have a term of one (1) year each, two (2) members initially appointed to the committee shall have a term of two (2) years each, and two (2) members initially appointed to the committee shall have a term of three (3) years each, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term. All subsequent appointments shall be for a term of three (3) years.

Any person appointed to the committee shall be eligible for reappointment, including any member of the committee appointed prior to July 15, 1994.

The members of the committee shall elect biennially from the committee’s private citizen membership the following officers: chairman, vice chairman, secretary-treasurer, and any assistant secretaries and assistant treasurers the committee deems necessary.

A majority of the members of the committee, determined by excluding any existing vacancies from the total number of members, shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of the members present at a duly called meeting of the committee shall be required for the purposes of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes.

The committee shall prepare bylaws and procedures applicable to the operations of the authority and submit them to the board to be promulgated as administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

Members of the committee shall be entitled to compensation for their services in an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each regular meeting of the committee and shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses in connection with the performance of their duties.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 17, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 25, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 338, § 18, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 149, § 213, effective July 12, 2006.

154.20-020.
Authority to commit cabinet to projects — Exceptions.

The secretary shall be authorized to commit the cabinet to any project or proposal, subject to approval of the committee as necessary except that any state incentive agreement requiring the participation of other agencies of state government shall require the concurrence of the board.

No project shall be funded in whole or part by the authority unless first approved by its committee pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

Lending decisions made by the authority shall be based, if possible, feasible, and not otherwise precluded by federal or state law, on utilizing state funds to leverage private sector investment.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 109, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 330, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 123, effective June 20, 2005; 2020 ch. 36, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

154.20-025.
Resident of bordering state may be considered qualified employee during review of applications.

During the review of applications under Subchapter 12, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 32, or 34 of KRS Chapter 154, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall have the authority to consider a resident of one (1) of Kentucky’s seven (7) contiguous bordering states as a qualified employee for a new, full-time position essential to an approved economic development project, as long as the development for the approved project is no more than twenty-five (25) miles from the boundary line of the bordering state.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 156, § 13, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-029.
Short title for KRS 154.20-030 to 154.20-150.

KRS 154.20-030 to 154.20-150 shall be known as the Kentucky Development Finance Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 152, § 1; 1978, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 1978.

154.20-030.
Purpose of authority.

It shall be the purpose of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority to develop and expand existing and alternative sources of energy and the conservation of energy, to assist business enterprise in obtaining additional sources of financing to aid this state in achieving the goal of long-term economic growth and full employment, to meet the growing competition for business enterprises, to preserve existing jobs, to create new jobs, to reduce the cost of business and production, to reduce the costs and liabilities by encouraging and financing efforts to reduce and avoid the generation of hazardous waste and toxic by-products, to foster export activity, to foster economic development on surface mining land, and to alleviate and prevent unemployment through the retention, promotion, and development of agriculture and agricultural facilities, agribusiness, forestry and forestry facilities, commerce and commercial facilities, health care and health related facilities, export markets and export activities, industry and industrial buildings and facilities, riverport facilities, tourism and tourist facilities, including the sites therefor, and agricultural, forestry, commercial, and industrial machinery and equipment, water and air pollution control equipment, and solid waste disposal facilities with respect thereto or for use by individuals for private sector employment. Such purposes shall be public purposes for which public money may be spent.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 152, § 2; 1978, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 340, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 105, § 19, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 107, § 12, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 371, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

154.20-033.
Powers of authority — Limitation of liability — Payment of administrative and operational expenses.

The authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of Subchapters 20 to 28, 30 to 34, and 60 of this chapter, including but not limited to:

Employing fiscal consultants, attorneys, appraisers, and other agents on behalf of the authority whom the authority deems necessary or convenient for the preparation and administration of agreements and documents necessary or incident to any project. The fees for the services provided by persons employed on behalf of the authority shall be paid by the beneficiary of a loan, grant, assessment, incentive, inducement, or tax credit under this chapter directly to the person providing consultation, advisory, legal or other services; and

Imposing and collecting fees and charges in connection with any transaction and providing for reasonable penalties for delinquent payment of fees and charges.

A director or officer of the authority shall not be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the execution of any obligation duly authorized by the authority.

The authority may accept and expend moneys which may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly, or moneys which may be received from any source, including income from the authority’s operations for effectuating its purpose, including without limitation the payment of the expenses of administration and operation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 194, § 26, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 178, § 25, effective July 15, 2008; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 29, effective June 26, 2009; 2018 ch. 199, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

154.20-035.
Purposes for borrowing money or issuing bonds or notes — Sale of bonds or notes — Terms — Tax exemption.

The authority may, upon approval of the board, borrow money and issue bonds or notes in accordance with KRS 154.10-035 and other provisions of this chapter appertaining, subject to KRS 42.420, for the following purposes:

To provide sufficient funds for achieving the authority’s purposes and objectives, including but not limited to, amounts necessary to pay the costs of acquiring projects or any part thereof; to make loans for the maintenance, operation, expansion, or development of riverport facilities that are under the authority of a developmental riverport authority established under KRS 65.520; to make loans for the cost of a project or any part thereof; to make loans pursuant to KRS 154.10-030(11) for an export-related transaction; to make grants; to provide money to guarantee or insure loans, leases, bonds, notes, or other indebtedness; to make working capital loans; for all other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out the authority’s purposes, objectives, and powers; or for any combination of the foregoing;

To refund bonds or notes of the authority issued under this chapter, by the issuance of new bonds, whether or not the bonds or notes to be refunded have matured or are subject to prior redemption or are to be paid, redeemed, or surrendered at the time of issuance of the refunding bonds or notes; and to issue bonds or notes partly to refund such bonds or notes and partly for any other purpose provided for by this section; or

To pay the costs of issuance of bonds or notes under this chapter; to pay interest on bonds or notes becoming payable prior to the receipt of the first revenues available for payment thereof as determined by the board; and to establish, in full or in part, a reserve for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds or notes in such amount as shall be determined by the board.

The bonds and notes, including, but not limited to, commercial paper, shall be authorized by resolution adopted by the authority, shall bear the date or dates, and shall mature at the time or times, not exceeding fifty (50) years from the date of issuance, as the resolution provides. The bonds and notes shall bear interest at the rate or rates set, reset, or calculated from time to time as provided in the resolution. The bonds and notes shall be in the denominations; be in the form, either coupon or registered; carry the registration privileges; be transferable; be executed in the manner; be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places; and be subject to the terms of prior redemption at the option of the authority or the holders thereof as the resolution or resolutions provide. The bonds and notes of the authority may be sold at public or private, negotiated sale, at the price or prices the authority determines. Bonds and notes may be sold at a discount.

Bonds or notes may be:

Made the subject of a put or agreement to repurchase by the authority or others;

Secured by a letter of credit or by any other collateral which the resolution may authorize;

Resold by the authority, once acquired by the authority, pursuant to any put or repurchase agreement without the acquisition being considered the extinguishment of the bond or note.

The authority may authorize its chairman or other officer to, by order:

Sell and deliver, and receive payment for notes or bonds;

Refund notes or bonds by the delivery of new notes or bonds, whether or not the notes or bonds to be refunded have matured, are subject to prior redemption, or are to be paid, redeemed, or surrendered at the time of the issuance of refunding bonds or notes;

Deliver notes or bonds, partly to refund notes or bonds and partly for any other authorized purposes;

Buy notes or bonds so issued at not more than the face value of the notes or bonds; or

Approve interest rates or methods for fixing interest rates, prices, discounts, maturities, principal amounts, denominations, dates of issuance, interest payment dates, redemption rights at the option of the authority or the holder, the place of delivery and payment, and other matters and procedures necessary to complete the transactions authorized.

Except as provided by the authority, every issue of its notes or bonds shall be general obligations of the authority payable out of revenues, properties, or money of the authority, subject only to agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging particular receipts, revenues, properties, or money as security therefor.

The notes or bonds of the authority shall be and are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to the provisions of the notes or bonds for registration.

A resolution authorizing notes or bonds may contain any or all of the following covenants which shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof:

A pledge of all or a part of the fees, charges, and revenues made or received by the authority, or all or a part of the money received in payment of lease rentals, or loans and interest thereon, and other money received or to be received to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or an issue thereof, subject to agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist;

A pledge of all or a part of the assets of the authority, including leases, or notes or mortgages and obligations securing the same to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of an issue of notes or bonds, subject to agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

A pledge of a loan, grant, or contribution from the federal, state, or municipality, or source in aid of a project as provided for in this chapter;

A provision as to the use and disposition of the revenues and income from leases, or from loans, notes, and mortgages owned by the authority;

A provision as to the establishment and setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof subject to this chapter;

Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of the notes or bonds may be applied and limitations on pledging those proceeds to secure the payment of other bonds or notes;

Authority for and limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds for the purposes provided for in the resolution and the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured;

A provision for the procedure, if any, by which the terms of a contract with noteholders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the number of noteholders or bondholders who are required to consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

Vesting in a trustee, or a secured party, such property, income, revenues, receipts, rights, remedies, powers, and duties in trust or otherwise as the authority may determine necessary to appropriate to adequately secure and protect noteholders and bondholders or to limit or abrogate the rights of the noteholders and bondholders. A trust agreement may be executed by the authority with any trustee who may be located inside or outside this state to accomplish any of the foregoing;

Providing for the payment of maintenance and repair costs of a project;

Establishing the insurance to be carried on a project and the use and disposition of insurance money and condemnation awards;

Establishing the terms, conditions, and agreements upon which the holder of the bonds, or a portion thereof, shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver by the Circuit Court. A receiver may enter and take possession of the project and maintain it or lease or sell it for cash or on an installment sales contract and prescribe rentals and payments therefor and collect, receive, and apply all income and revenues thereafter arising in the same manner and to the same extent as the authority; and

Providing for any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way affect the security or protection of the notes or bonds.

A pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The money or property pledged and received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without a physical delivery or further act. The lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority and shall be valid and binding against the transfer of the money or property pledged, irrespective of whether the parties have notice. It shall not be necessary to record the resolution, the trust agreement, or any other instrument by which a pledge is created.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the notes or bonds shall be liable personally on the notes or bonds or be subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

The state shall not be liable for any financial obligations of the authority nor shall any such obligations or bonds be considered a debt of the state. The obligations shall contain on the face thereof a statement indicating this fact.

The notes and bonds of the authority shall be securities in which the public officers and bodies of this state and municipalities and municipal subdivisions, insurance companies, associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, banks, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds.

The property of the authority and its income and operation shall be exempt from all taxation by this state or any of its political subdivisions. All bonds and notes of the authority, the interest thereon, and their transfer shall be exempt from all taxation by this state or any of its political subdivisions, except for estate, gift, and inheritance taxes, notwithstanding that interest on bonds or notes of the authority may be or become subject to federal income taxation as a result of legislative action by the federal government. The state covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of notes and bonds issued by the authority under this chapter, in consideration of the acceptance of and payment for the notes and bonds, that the notes and bonds of the authority, issued pursuant to this chapter, the interest thereon, the transfer thereof, and all its fees, charges, gifts, grants, revenues, receipts, and other money received or to be received and pledged to pay or secure the payment of the notes or bonds shall at all times be free and exempt from all state or local taxation provided by the laws of this state, except for estate, gift, and inheritance taxes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 105, § 20, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 371, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

154.20-040.
Loan insurance account — Deposits — Money transferred.

Loan insurance shall be funded by an account, which shall be established and managed by the authority, to be known as the loan insurance account.

The authority shall pay into the account any money appropriated or otherwise provided by this state for that purpose; any money which the authority receives as fees or premiums for its provision of loan, lease, or debenture insurance; loan, lease, or debenture guarantees; or letters of credit; and any other money made available to the authority for the purpose of loan insurance from any other source, public or private.

Money in the loan insurance account may be transferred into any other account established by the authority, unless the authority is otherwise obligated to retain the money in the loan insurance account or if the money was appropriated by this state solely for that purpose.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 8, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-045.
Insurance or guarantee by authority.

The authority may insure, guarantee, or issue letters of credit for all or a part of a loan or debenture of others, public or private.

The authority may insure, guarantee, or issue letters of credit for all or a part of a lease entered into by others, public or private.

The authority may procure insurance, a guarantee, or a letter of credit from any source for all or a part of a loan, debenture, or lease of others, public or private. The authority may procure insurance, a guarantee, or a letter of credit for either a single loan, debenture, or lease or for any combination of loans, debentures, or leases.

The authority may insure, guarantee, or issue letters of credit for all or a part of a revenue bond issued by the authority, another state agency or authority, or another entity or authority authorized by law to issue revenue bonds.

The authority may procure insurance, a guarantee, or a letter of credit for all or a part of a revenue bond issue of the authority, another state agency or authority, or another entity or authority authorized by law to issue revenue bonds. The authority may procure insurance, a guarantee, or a letter of credit for either all or part of a single revenue bond issue or for all or a part of any combination of revenue bond issues.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 9, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-050.
Contract of insurance by authority — Authority not an insurer.

To provide loan insurance pursuant to KRS 154.20-040 and 154.20-045, the authority may enter into a contract of insurance. The Kentucky Insurance Code shall not apply to the insurance contract, and the authority shall not be considered an insurer subject to the Kentucky Insurance Code by virtue of entering into the contract.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 10, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-060.
Projects eligible for insurance by authority — Priority given to certain projects.

Insurance, guarantees, or letters of credit provided or procured pursuant to KRS 154.20-040 and 154.20-045 shall be provided or procured only for projects within this state which are consistent with the purposes and objectives of the authority and this chapter.

The authority shall give paramount priority in providing or procuring insurance, guarantees, and letters of credit to projects which have the greatest potential for creating new jobs or retaining current jobs within this state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, when considering project applications from a riverport facility established under KRS 65.520, the authority shall not give priority to regulatory criteria pertaining to direct employment at these facilities and shall instead give priority to the indirect employment maintained or created.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 2000, ch. 371, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

154.20-070.
Authority backing limited to projects with significant private sector financial support — Terms and conditions determined by authority.

Insurance, guarantees, or letters of credit shall not be provided or procured unless the authority shall be legally assured that the loans, debentures, or leases insured, or guaranteed, or for which letters of credit are issued, will be used to assist projects which also have significant private sector financial support.

Insurance, guarantees, or letters of credit may be provided or procured on the terms and conditions the authority, in its sole discretion, shall determine to be reasonable, appropriate, and consistent with the purposes and objectives of the authority and this chapter.

The authority may charge the lender or the borrower, or both, a fee or premium for loan, debenture, or lease insurance, guarantee, or letter of credit. Guidelines for premiums or fees charged by the authority for loan, debenture, or lease insurance, guarantees, or letters of credit shall be established by the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 12, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-080.
Agreements with lenders — Provisions included.

The authority may enter into agreements with lenders for participation in loan insurance. The agreements may include, but need not be limited to:

Authorization for the lender to determine, collect, and transmit to the authority a fee or premium charge within a specified range established consistent with the purposes and objectives of the authority;

Specification of whether the premium charge shall be paid by the lender, the borrower, the authority, or by a combination thereof in specified proportions;

The procedure by which a lender may make a claim upon the authority upon default by the borrower and the conditions under which a claim may be made;

The maximum amount of claims a lender may make upon the authority, which amount may be equal to, greater than, or less than the proportion of the total premiums collected by the authority which is accounted for by premiums collected by the lender.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 13, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-090.
Special fund to secure loan insurance account obligations.

The authority may establish a special fund or funds solely to secure some or all of its obligations within the loan insurance account into which fees or premiums collected by the authority for loan, debenture, or lease insurance, guarantees, or letters of credit may be deposited.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 14, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-100.
Reclamation development fund — Deposits.

Assistance for reclamation development projects shall be provided by a fund, which shall be established and managed by the authority, to be known as the reclamation development fund.

The authority shall pay into the fund any money appropriated or otherwise provided by the state for that purpose and any other money available to the authority for assistance for reclamation development projects, including funds from public or private sources.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 15, effective July 15, 1988.

154.20-105.
Use of reclamation development fund.

Moneys in the reclamation development fund:

Shall be used to foster reclamation development projects described in a reclamation development plan submitted to the authority as part of the application for reclamation development fund moneys, except that no money in the reclamation development fund shall be used for any reclamation development project until the reclamation development plan with respect to that project has been approved by the Energy and Environment Cabinet pursuant to KRS Chapter 350; and

May be made available to any person or entity, public or private, organized for profit or not for profit; and

Shall be made on the terms and conditions the authority, in its sole discretion, determines to be reasonable, appropriate, and consistent with the purposes and objectives of the authority and this chapter, which may include, but not be limited to, the pledging of adequate security.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 16, effective July 15, 1988; 2010, ch. 24, § 196, effective July 15, 2010.

154.20-110.
Written approval of application by local agency.

All applications made to the authority shall be subject to written approval by a local development corporation, local development agency, or in the absence thereof, approval by a local governmental body.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 340, § 22, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 201, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.

154.20-120.
Attorney’s fees as part of judgment.

In any legal action brought by the authority or the insurance corporation to obtain the collection or repayment of a defaulted loan, as part of a successful judgment against the debtor or guarantor, the authority or insurance corporation shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorney’s fees, provided that provision therefor is contained in the agreements signed by the debtor as part of a loan or other debt transaction between the debtor and the authority or insurance corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 340, § 21, effective July 15, 1980.

154.20-130.
Financial interests of authority members.

No member of the authority or officer or employee thereof shall either directly or indirectly be a party to or be in any manner interested in any contract or agreement with the authority for any matter, cause, or thing whatsoever by reason whereof any liability or indebtedness shall in any way be created against such authority.

Should a member, officer, or employee of the authority have such an interest, then the member, officer, or employee of the authority shall:

Disclose the interest;

Refrain from participating in discussions relating to any such contract or agreement with the authority; and

Refrain from voting or otherwise taking action on any such contract or agreement of the authority.

If any contract or agreement shall be made in violation of the provisions of this section the same shall be null and void and no action shall be maintained thereon against such authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 152, § 18; 1994, ch. 450, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

154.20-140.
Negotiations with other agencies — Construction of authority’s powers and obligations.

The authority may negotiate with other agencies of the state government to obtain the use of moneys which such agencies are authorized to invest in government obligations. Funds so negotiated shall be transferred on an inter-account basis to the appropriate fund of the authority. The authority may also negotiate with the State Property and Buildings Commission for the issuance and sale of revenue or other authorized bonds in accordance with the methods prescribed in KRS 56.520 for the purposes of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to give the authority power to pledge the credit or taxing power of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 152, § 19; 1978, ch. 96, § 13, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 340, § 15, effective July 15, 1980.

154.20-150.
Project status reports by authority — Annual report — Construction activity report.

On or before October 1, 1992, and on or before the first day of every third month thereafter, the authority shall provide a written project status report to the Legislative Research Commission, and the authority shall be compelled to send a representative to testify on the project status report and the authority shall provide additional information on any projects upon request by the Legislative Research Commission. The written project status report shall include but is not limited to:

The current status of each project under consideration by the authority, the proposed cost of a project, for each project under consideration, including any proposed financial obligations of the authority, the number of jobs to be created or retained by each project under consideration, and a description of the applicants with respect to each project under consideration; and

The current status of each project, along with an updated cost for each project in progress, including any financial obligations of the authority and a description of the principals with respect to each project in progress.

On or before November 1 of each year, the authority shall prepare an annual report and make it available on the Cabinet for Economic Development Web site as required by KRS 154.12-2035. The report shall include information about the success or failure of each completed project, in order to determine the effectiveness of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

In addition to the project status report, all construction, reconstruction, or alteration, financed or facilitated in whole or in part by the authority shall be reported to the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet and to the Kentucky Legislative Research Commission not later than fifteen (15) days following the end of the month in which the agreement or contract facilitating or permitting such activity was executed. This construction activity report shall be subject to public information requests as provided by KRS 61.878. Reports shall list subject construction activity by location of project site, and shall specify the type of construction, project owner, estimated cost of project, and estimated starting and completion dates if known.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 383, § 20, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 105, § 21, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 271, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 211, § 67, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 35, effective June 25, 2009; 2014, ch. 134, § 7, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 20, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 146, § 17, effective June 27, 2019.

154.20-160.
Development of criteria for productivity gains to be used in considering requests for financial assistance.

The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, or its successor, shall develop, pursuant to KRS 154.20-030 to 154.20-150, criteria which may be used by the authority in considering the requests by industrial entities for financial assistance for proposed industrial development projects. The authority, or its successor, may develop criteria which shall include, but not be limited to, potential productivity gains due to the funding of the proposed technological investment.

In developing criteria as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the authority shall consider the following:

For existing firms, past productivity trends and potential productivity gains due to the funding of technological investments; and

For new firms, the degree to which the proposed technological investment will be expected to cause the firm’s productivity to be higher than the average for firms in the industry it represents.

When considering productivity gains, the authority shall consider the following:

Total real value of output defined as the total sales in real dollars in the calendar year adjusted by the producer price index for the standard industrial classification of that business; or
(a) 1.

Total real value of output defined as the total sales in real dollars in the calendar year adjusted by the producer price index for the standard industrial classification of that business; or

Potential total real value of output defined as the forecasted total sales in real dollars as measured in the current period; and

Productivity measure defined as the total real value of output for a calendar year divided by total employment for that calendar year; or
(b) 1.

Productivity measure defined as the total real value of output for a calendar year divided by total employment for that calendar year; or

Potential productivity measure defined as the potential total real value of output divided by the total forecasted employment.

Productivity trends of a business shall be evaluated by comparing the annual rate of change in the productivity measure for an individual business to the annual rate of change in productivity measure for businesses engaged in a similar economic activity. The recommended source for industry productivity measures is the rate of change in industry labor productivity indexes published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 19, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 20, effective July 15, 1994.

154.20-170.
Priority consideration for certain businesses.

Industrial entities, agricultural business entities, business enterprises, or private sector firms which are members of a business network within the meaning of KRS 154.1-010 and businesses that compose the secondary wood products industry as defined in KRS 154.47-005(8), shall be given priority consideration under state economic development loan, grant, and incentive programs administered by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, highest priority consideration under state economic development loan, grant, and incentive programs administered by the authority shall be given to those projects that are located in counties of Kentucky which have had an average countywide rate of unemployment of fifteen percent (15%) or greater in the most recent twelve (12) consecutive months for which unemployment figures are available, on the basis of the final unemployment figures calculated by the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 390, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2001, ch. 133, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 65, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 211, § 68, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 36, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 49, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 117, § 17, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 199, § 21, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 146, § 18, effective June 27, 2019.